Wyoming statutes. Title 5 Courts
Chapter 7 Clerks of Court

Cross references. —

As to clerk of supreme court, see §

5-2-201

et seq.

As to clerk of district court, see §

5-3-201

et seq.

As to duty of clerk or judge to notify department of revenue and taxation of unsatisfied judgments, see §

31-9-301

.

As to acknowledgment of conveyances, see §

34-1-113

.

As to duties of clerks with respect to vital records, see §

35-1-401

et seq.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

15A Am. Jur. 2d Clerks of Court § 1 et seq.

14A C.J.S. Clerks of Courts § 1 et seq.

§ 5-7-101.
General duties of clerk; under direction of court.

The clerk of each of
the courts shall exercise the powers conferred and perform the duties
enjoined upon him by statute and by the common law; and in the performance
of his duties he shall be under the direction of his court.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 19; R.S. 1887, § 2355; R.S. 1899, § 3438; C.S. 1910, § 4281; C.S. 1920, § 5550; R.S. 1931, § 89-210; C.S. 1945, § 3-210; W.S. 1957, § 5-139.

Witness is sworn by court where clerk administers oath. —

Under this section and §

1-2-103

, providing for administering of oaths, an averment, in an information charging perjury, that the accused was in due form of law sworn by the court, having competent authority to administer to him the oath of a witness before the court, is supported by the proof that the oath was administered to him by the clerk. Fletcher v. State, 20 Wyo. 284, 123 P. 80,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 35

(Wyo. 1912).

Judge may not proscribe filing of legal papers. —

Notwithstanding any legal rights which a judge may have to control his clerk, the supreme court cannot approve his proscribing the filing of legal papers. Linde v. Bentley, 482 P.2d 121,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 202

(Wyo. 1971).

Refusal of trial judge to amend the record

will not be disturbed on appeal, where the refusal is based on judge's personal recollection. State ex rel. Conway v. Blake, 5 Wyo. 107, 38 P. 354,

1894 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo. 1894).

Law reviews. —

For case note, “Constitutional Law — Due Process — Replevin —
Right to Notice and Hearing Prior to Deprivation of Property. Fuentes v. Shevin, 407 U.S. 67, 32 L. Ed. 2d 556, 92 S. Ct. 1983, 1972 U.S. LEXIS 42 (1972),” see VIII Land & Water L. Rev. 315 (1973).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Applicability of judicial immunity to acts of clerk of court under state law, 34 ALR4th 1186.

§ 5-7-102.
Precipe for writs and process.

All writs and orders
for provisional remedies and process of every kind shall be issued
by the clerks of the several courts; but before they are issued, a
precipe shall be filed with the clerk demanding the same.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 13; R.S. 1887, § 2349; R.S. 1899, § 3432; C.S. 1910, § 4275; C.S. 1920, § 5544; R.S. 1931, § 89-204; C.S. 1945, § 3-204; W.S. 1957, § 5-140.

Law reviews. —

For case note, “Constitutional Law — Due Process — Replevin —
Right to Notice and Hearing Prior to Deprivation of Property. Fuentes v. Shevin, 407 U.S. 67, 32 L. Ed. 2d 556, 92 S. Ct. 1983, 1972 U.S. LEXIS 42 (1972),” see VIII Land & Water L. Rev. 315 (1973).

§ 5-7-103.
Filing, preserving and use of papers; microfilming permitted.

The clerk shall file
together and carefully preserve in his office, all papers delivered
to him for that purpose in every action or proceeding. He shall not
permit the papers to be taken from his office except to be used at
a session of the court or upon legal process, and he shall be liable
upon his official bond to the party suffering injury on account of
any violation of this section. This section shall not apply to matters
in probate. Upon the order of the judge of the district, the clerk
may transmit by express or registered mail to an attorney of the state
appearing in the action or proceeding, who resides in a different
county or away from the county seat, such original files as are not
represented by copies in the clerk’s office, and the clerk shall take
the attorney’s receipt for each paper in each case. Nothing in this
section shall limit or prohibit the clerk from microfilming papers
in his office, disposing of the originals in accordance with W.S.

9-2-411

and retaining the official microfilm in lieu of the original
papers pursuant to W.S.

9-2-413

.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 14; R.S. 1887, § 2349; R.S. 1899, § 3433; Laws 1903, ch. 24, § 1; C.S. 1910, § 4276; C.S. 1920, § 5545; R.S. 1931, § 89-205; C.S. 1945, § 3-205; W.S. 1957, § 5-141; Laws 1973, ch. 86, § 2.

§ 5-7-104.
Clerk's indorsement of papers.

The clerk shall endorse
upon every paper filed with him the date of the filing thereof, and
upon every order for a provisional remedy, and upon every undertaking
given under the same, the date of its return to his office.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 15; R.S. 1887, § 2351; R.S. 1899, § 3434; C.S. 1910, § 4277; C.S. 1920, § 5546; R.S. 1931, § 89-206; C.S. 1945, § 3-206; W.S. 1957, § 5-142.

§ 5-7-105.
Clerk to record proceedings of court.

The clerk shall record the proceedings of the court.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 16; R.S. 1887, § 2352; R.S. 1899, § 3435; C.S. 1910, § 4278; C.S. 1920, § 5547; R.S. 1931, § 89-207; C.S. 1945, § 3-207; W.S. 1957, § 5-143; 2019 ch. 24, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

Cross references. —

For duty of clerks of court to furnish transcript of proceedings, containing the court's judgment or final order in, upon request, see §

1-1-107

.

As to entry of judgment or order by clerk of court, see Rule 58, W.R.C.P.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019,
substituted "record the proceedings of" for "keep the journals, records, books and papers appertaining to", added a period after "court" and deleted "and record its proceedings.".

Petition need not plead entry of decree by clerk. —

A contention that petition is fatally defective for failure to plead entry of divorce decree is without merit. When the decree is rendered, it becomes the mandatory duty of the clerk of the district court to properly enter it in the journal of the court under this section and §

1-16-301

, and this is presumed to have been rightly done, thus making it unnecessary to allege and show affirmatively the entry of the decree. Edelman v. Edelman, 65 Wyo. 271, 199 P.2d 840,

1949 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1949).

The refusal of a trial court to correct record

on affidavits of a defendant and his attorney will not be disturbed on appeal, where refusal is based on positive recollection of the judge as to what transpired at the trial. State ex rel. Conway v. Blake, 5 Wyo. 107, 38 P. 354,

1894 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo. 1894).

Cited

in

Hahn v. Citizens State Bank, 25 Wyo. 467, 171 P. 889, 172 P. 705,

1918 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(1918).

Law reviews. —

For article “Administration of the General Property Tax in Wyoming,” see 4 Wyo. L.J. 227.

§ 5-7-106.
Record of orders out of court. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 17; R.S. 1887, § 2353; R.S. 1899, § 3436; C.S. 1910, § 4279; C.S. 1920, § 5548; R.S. 1931, § 89-208; C.S. 1945, § 3-208; W.S. 1957, § 5-144; repealed by 2019 ch. 24, § 2, effective July 1, 2019.

§ 5-7-107.
Duties prescribed for clerks of district court applicable to all
clerks.

The provisions prescribing
the duties of clerks of the district court shall, so far as they are
applicable, apply to the clerks of other courts of record.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 18; R.S. 1887, § 2354; R.S. 1899, § 3437; C.S. 1910, § 4280; C.S. 1920, § 5549; R.S. 1931, § 89-209; C.S. 1945, § 3-209; W.S. 1957, § 5-145.

Cross references. —

As to duties of clerks of district court, see §

5-3-201

et seq.